Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
125

PROCUREMENT
AND CONTROL OF DISTRIBUTION

OF
NECESSARY COMMODITIES

Section

125-1 "Emergency" defined

125-2 Powers in an emergency

125-3 Charges

125-4 Personnel, delegation of powers

125-5 Contributions

125-6 Investigations, surveys

125-7 Fraud, misdemeanor

Note

Chapter heading
amended by L 1974, c 5, §1.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next